Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.450

Dissolution—Collection of taxes to discharge indebtedness.

If, at the time of election to dissolve, a district has outstanding any indebtedness, the vote to dissolve the district dissolves it for all purposes except the levy and collection of taxes for the payment of the indebtedness, and expenses of assessing, levying, and collecting such taxes.

Until the indebtedness is paid, the county commissioners of the county in which the greater portion of the district was situated shall act as the ex officio district board and shall levy taxes and perform such functions as may be necessary in order to pay the indebtedness.

[ 1957 c 153 s 45.]